test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_teltta_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - teltta: # ML, checked
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom: teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen: telta
    teltta+N+Sg+Acc: telta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill: teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc: telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com:  telttain
    teltta+N+Sg+Abe: teltattáá
    teltta+N+Ess: telttan
    teltta+N+Par: telttad
    teltta+N+Pl+Nom: teltah
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen: [teeltai, teltai]
    teltta+N+Pl+Acc: teeltaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Ill: telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Loc: telttain
    teltta+N+Pl+Com: [teltaiguin, teltaigijn]
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe: teltaittáá

  Noun - seŋkka: # ML, checked
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Nom:  seŋkka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Gen:  seŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Acc:  seŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Ill:  seeŋkan
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Loc:  seŋkkaast
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Com:  seŋkkain
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Abe:  seŋkattáá
    seŋkka+N+Ess:  seŋkkan
    seŋkka+N+Par:  seŋkkad
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Nom:  seŋkah
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Gen: [seeŋkai, seŋkai]
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Acc:  seeŋkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Ill:  seŋkkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Loc:  seŋkkain
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Com:  [seŋkaiguin, seŋkaigijn]
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Abe:  seŋkaittáá
